Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.12.005

Voting securities held by state trust company.

(1) Voting securities of a state trust company held by the state trust company in a fiduciary capacity under a will or trust, whether registered in its own name or in the name of its nominee, may not be voted in the election of directors or managers or on a matter affecting the compensation of directors, managers, officers, or employees of the state trust company in that capacity, unless:

(a) Under the terms of the will or trust, the manner in which the voting securities are to be voted may be determined by a donor or beneficiary of the will or trust and the donor or beneficiary actually makes the determination in the matter at issue;

(b) The terms of the will or trust expressly direct the manner in which the securities must be voted to the extent that no discretion is vested in the state trust company as fiduciary; or

(c) The securities are voted solely by a cofiduciary that is not an affiliate of the state trust company, as if the cofiduciary were the sole fiduciary.

(2) Voting securities of a state trust company that cannot be voted under this section are considered to be authorized but unissued for purposes of determining the procedures for and results of the affected vote.

[ 2014 c 37 s 346.]